en: Compatible plate size: 10 x 12 in; 11 x 14 in; 8 x 10 in; Custom/Other; ESAPI Large; ESAPI Medium; None (no plates); Other
sv: Kompatibel tallriksstorlek: 10 x 12 tum; 11 x 14 tum; 8 x 10 tum; Special/övrigt; ESAPI large; ESAPI medium; Ingen (inga plattor); Övrigt
cs: Vhodná velikost desky: 10 x 12 palců; 11 x 14 palců; 8 x 10 palců; Vlastní/jiné; ESAPI velká; ESAPI střední; Žádné (bez plátů); Jiné
hr-HR: Kompatibilna veličina ploče: 10 x 12 in; 11 x 14 in; 8 x 10 in; Prilagođeno/ostalo; ESAPI velika; ESAPI srednja; Ništa (bez ploča); Ostalo
pl: Zgodna wielkość płyty: 10 x 12 cali; 11 x 14 cali; 8 x 10 cali; Niestandardowy / Inny; ESAPI Duży; ESAPI Średni; Brak (bez płyt); Inne
pt-BR: Tamanho de placa compatível: 10 x 12 pol; 11 x 14 pol; 8 x 10 pol; Personalizado/outro; ESAPI Grande; ESAPI Médio; Nenhum (sem placas); Outro
pt-PT: Tamanho de placa compatível: 10 x 12 pol.; 11 x 14 pol.; 8 x 10 pol.; Personalizado/outro; ESAPI grande; ESAPI médio; Nenhum (sem placas); Outro
vi: Kích thước đĩa tương thích: 10 x 12 in; 11 x 14 in; 8 x 10 in; Tùy chỉnh/Khác; ESAPI cỡ L; ESAPI cỡ M; Không (không có tấm giáp); Khác
ro-RO: Dimensiune de placă compatibilă: 10 x 12 in; 11 x 14 in; 8 x 10 in; Personalizat/Altele; ESAPI Mare; ESAPI Medie; Niciuna (fără plăci); Altele
zh-CN: 适用防弹板尺寸: 10 x 12 英寸; 11 x 14 英寸; 8 x 10 英寸; 自定义/其他; ESAPI 大号; ESAPI 中号; 无（无插板）; 其他
da: Kompatibel pladestørrelse: 10 x 12 in; 11 x 14 in; 8 x 10 in; Specialstørrelse/andet; ESAPI Large; ESAPI Medium; Ingen (ingen plader); Andet
it: Taglia del piatto compatibile: 10 x 12 in; 11 x 14 in; 8 x 10 in; Personalizzate/altro; ESAPI Large; ESAPI Medium; Nessuna (senza piastre); Altro
tr: Uyumlu plaka boyutu: 10 x 12 inç; 11 x 14 inç; 8 x 10 inç; Özel/Diğer; ESAPI Büyük; ESAPI Orta; Yok (plakasız); Diğer
sk-SK: Kompatibilná veľkosť doštičky: 10 x 12 palcov; 11 x 14 palcov; 8 x 10 palcov; Vlastné/iné; ESAPI Large; ESAPI Medium; Žiadne (bez plátov); Iné
nl: Compatibele plaatgrootte: 10 x 12 in; 11 x 14 in; 8 x 10 in; Aangepast/overig; ESAPI Large; ESAPI Medium; Geen (geen platen); Overig
es: Tamaño de placa compatible: 10 x 12 in; 11 x 14 in; 8 x 10 in; Personalizado/otro; ESAPI grande; ESAPI mediano; Ninguna (sin placas); Otro
ko: 호환 플레이트 크기: 10 x 12인치; 11 x 14인치; 8 x 10인치; 맞춤형/기타; ESAPI 라지; ESAPI 미디엄; 없음(플레이트 없음); 기타
nb: Kompatibel platestørrelse: 10 x 12 tommer; 11 x 14 tommer; 8 x 10 tommer; Tilpasset/annet; ESAPI Large; ESAPI Medium; Ingen (ingen plater); Annet
sl-SI: Združljiva velikost plošče: 10 x 12 in; 11 x 14 in; 8 x 10 in; Po meri/drugo; ESAPI Large; ESAPI Medium; Brez (brez plošč); Drugo
de: Kompatible Plattengröße: 10 x 12 Zoll; 11 x 14 Zoll; 8 x 10 Zoll; Sondergröße/Sonstige; ESAPI Groß; ESAPI Mittel; Keine (ohne Platten); Sonstige
ru: Совместимый размер пластины: 10 x 12 дюймов; 11 x 14 дюймов; 8 x 10 дюймов; Нестандартный / другое; ESAPI (большой); ESAPI (средний); Нет (без пластин); Другое
fr: Dimensions de plaque compatibles: 10 x 12 po; 11 x 14 po; 8 x 10 po; Personnalisée/autre; ESAPI Large; ESAPI Medium; Aucune (sans plaque); Autre
ja: 対応プレートサイズ: 10 x 12 インチ; 11 x 14 インチ; 8 x 10 インチ; カスタム/その他; ESAPIラージ; ESAPIミディアム; なし (プレートなし); その他
lt-LT: Suderinamo dydžio lėkštės: 10 x 12 col.; 11 x 14 col.; 8 x 10 col.; Pasirinktinis / kita; ESAPI didelė; ESAPI vidutinė; Nėra (be plokščių); Kita
th: ขนาดแผ่นฐานที่เข้ากันได้: 10 x 12 นิ้ว; 11 x 14 นิ้ว; 8 x 10 นิ้ว; กำหนดเอง/อื่นๆ; ESAPI ขนาดใหญ่; ESAPI ขนาดกลาง; ไม่มี (ไม่มีแผ่นเกราะ); อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 相容板面尺寸: 10 x 12 吋; 11 x 14 吋; 8 x 10 吋; 自訂/其他; ESAPI 大號; ESAPI 中號; 無 (無防彈板); 其他
fi: Yhteensopiva levykoko: 10 x 12 in; 11 x 14 in; 8 x 10 in; Mukautettu / muu; ESAPI Large; ESAPI Medium; Ei mitään (ei levyjä); Muu
el: Συμβατό μέγεθος πλάκας: 10 x 12 in; 11 x 14 in; 8 x 10 in; Προσαρμοσμένο/Άλλο; ESAPI Large; ESAPI Medium; Κανένα (χωρίς πλάκες); Άλλο
bg-BG: Съвместим размер пластина: 10 x 12 инча; 11 x 14 инча; 8 x 10 инча; Персонализирани/Друго; ESAPI голям размер; ESAPI среден размер; Няма (без плочи); Друго
hu: Kompatibilis tányérméret: 10 x 12 hüvelyk; 11 x 14 hüvelyk; 8 x 10 hüvelyk; Egyedi/egyéb; ESAPI nagy; ESAPI közepes; Nincs (lemezek nélkül); Egyéb